test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_moola_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - moolâ:
    moolâ+N+Sg+Nom: mooḷâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Gen: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Acc: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Ill: mooḷân
    moolâ+N+Sg+Loc: moolâst
    moolâ+N+Sg+Com: mooláin
    moolâ+N+Sg+Abe: moˊlâttáá
    moolâ+N+Ess: moollân
    moolâ+N+Par: moollâd
    moolâ+N+Pl+Nom: moolah
    moolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [moolâi, moˊlâi]
    moolâ+N+Pl+Acc: moolâid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Ill: mooláid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Loc: moolâin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Com: moˊlâiguin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Abe: moˊlâittáá
